Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1108
Prosecution; affirmative defense.

In any prosecution under this article, it shall be an affirmative defense that the writing, paper, instrument, or article possessed by the defendant was neither used nor intended to be used in the advancement of an unlawful gambling activity.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 224;

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 8.